Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.130

Returns rendered by dealers, handlers, processors.

Each dealer, handler, and processor shall at such times as the commission may by rule or regulation require, file with the commission a return under oath on forms to be furnished by the commission, stating the quantity of apples handled, shipped, or processed by him or her during the period prescribed by the commission. The return shall contain such further information as the commission may require.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6022; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.130. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 11; RRS s 2874-11.]